test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v3juosta_juosta_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - juosta - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     juosta+V+Inf: juosta
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juoksen
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: juokset
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juoksee
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: juoksema
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: juoksetta
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: juosthaan
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: juoksin
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: juoksit
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: juoksi
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: juoksima
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: juoksitta
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: juosthiin
     juosta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: juossu
     juosta+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: juostu
     juosta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: juosheet
     juosta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: juokseeva
     juosta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: juokseevat
     juosta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: juostava
     juosta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: juostavat
     
     juosta+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: juoksisin
     juosta+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: juoksisit
     juosta+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: juoksis
     juosta+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: juoksisimma
     juosta+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: juoksisitta
     juosta+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: juostais
     juosta+V+Pass+Cond: juostais

     juosta+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: juokse
     juosta+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: juoskaa
     
     juosta+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: juoksemassa
     juosta+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: juoksemasta
     juosta+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: juoksemhaan
     juosta+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: juoksemalla
     juosta+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: juoksematta
